Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.150.276

Local revenues—Enrichment of program of basic education—"Local revenues" defined.

(1)(a) Beginning September 1, 2018, school districts may use local revenues only for documented and demonstrated enrichment of the state's statutory program of basic education as authorized in subsection (2) of this section.

(b) Nothing in this section revises the definition or the state funding of the program of basic education under RCW 28A.150.220 and 28A.150.260.

(c) For purposes of this section, "local revenues" means enrichment levies collected under RCW 84.52.053, local effort assistance funding received under chapter 28A.500 RCW, and other school district local revenues including, but not limited to, grants, donations, and state and federal payments in lieu of taxes, except that "local revenues" does not include other federal revenues, or local revenues that operate as an offset to the district's basic education allocation under RCW 28A.150.250.

(2)(a) Enrichment activities are permitted under this section if they provide supplementation beyond the state:

(i) Minimum instructional offerings of RCW 28A.150.220 or 28A.150.260;

(ii) Staffing ratios or program components of RCW 28A.150.260, including providing additional staff for class size reduction beyond class sizes allocated in the prototypical school model and additional staff beyond the staffing ratios allocated in the prototypical school formula;

(iii) Program components of RCW 28A.150.200, 28A.150.220, or 28A.150.260; or

(iv) Program of professional learning as defined by RCW 28A.415.430 beyond that allocated pursuant to RCW 28A.150.415.

(b) Permitted enrichment activities consist of:

(i) Extracurricular activities, extended school days, or an extended school year;

(ii) Additional course offerings beyond the minimum instructional program established in the state's statutory program of basic education;

(iii) Activities associated with early learning programs;

(iv) Any additional salary costs attributable to the provision or administration of the enrichment activities allowed under this subsection; and

(v) Additional activities or enhancements that the office of the superintendent of public instruction determines to be a documented and demonstrated enrichment of the state's statutory program of basic education under (a) of this subsection and for which the superintendent approves proposed expenditures during the preballot approval process required by RCW 84.52.053 and 28A.505.240.

(3) In addition to the limitations of subsections (1) and (2) of this section and of RCW 28A.400.200, permitted enrichment activities are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) If a school district spends local revenues for salary costs attributable to the administration of enrichment programs, the portion of administrator salaries attributable to that purpose may not exceed twenty-five percent of the total district expenditures for administrator salaries; and

(b) Supplemental contracts under RCW 28A.400.200 are subject to the limitations of this section.

(4) The superintendent of public instruction must adopt rules to implement this section.

[ 2018 c 266 s 301; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 501.]

NOTES:

Intent—2017 3rd sp.s. c 13: See note following RCW 28A.150.410.